Washington statutes.
RCW 17.10.260

Administrative powers to be exercised in conformity with administrative procedure act—Use of weed control substances subject to other acts.

The administrative powers granted under this chapter to the director of the department of agriculture and to the state noxious weed control board shall be exercised in conformity with the provisions of the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, as now or hereafter amended. The use of any substance to control noxious weeds shall be subject to the provisions of the water pollution control act, chapter 90.48 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, the Washington pesticide control act, chapter 15.58 RCW, and the Washington pesticide application act, chapter 17.21 RCW.

[ 1987 c 438 s 33; 1969 ex.s. c 113 s 28.]